Maryland, session 2025, HB0612.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–136.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE LIFESAVER SCHOOLS PROGRAM.
(3) “THERAPY DOG” MEANS A DOG THAT IS:
(I) TRAINED TO PROVIDE AFFECTION AND COMFORT TO
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0612*

HOUSE BILL 612
CHILDREN WHO NEED EMOTIONAL SUPPORT IN A SCHOOL SETTING; AND
(II) CERTIFIED OR REGISTERED AS A THERAPY DOG.
(B) (1) THERE IS A LIFESAVER SCHOOLS PROGRAM.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO RECOGNIZE PUBLIC
SCHOOLS THAT PROVIDE HEALTH AND SAFETY TRAINING TO STUDENTS AND
SCHOOL PERSONNEL.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DESIGNATE AND PUBLICLY RECOGNIZE
A PUBLIC SCHOOL AS A LIFESAVER SCHOOL IF THE SCHOOL APPLIES AND MEETS
THE CRITERIA FOR A LIFESAVER SCHOOL ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) AT MINIMUM, THE DEPARTMENT’S CRITERIA FOR A LIFESAVER
SCHOOL SHALL REQUIRE A PUBLIC SCHOOL TO:
(I) OFFER TO STUDENTS:
1. EVIDENCE–BASED TRAINING ON FIRST AID;
2. A MENTAL HEALTH WELLNESS PROGRAM OR A PEER
MENTORING PROGRAM; AND
3. A SCHOOLWIDE ASSEMBLY ON MENTAL HEALTH
WELLNESS AND RESOURCES;
(II) PROVIDE SERVICE HOURS TO STUDENTS FOR
PARTICIPATING IN HEALTH AND SAFETY ACTIVITIES;
(III) 1. OFFER TO SCHOOL PERSONNEL AS PROFESSIONAL
DEVELOPMENT A MENTAL HEALTH WELLNESS PROGRAM OR TRAINING ON FIRST
AID; AND
2. AUTHORIZE SCHOOL PERSONNEL TO PARTICIPATE IN
THE PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT DURING SCHOOL HOURS, EARN ADDITIONAL
COMPENSATION FOR PARTICIPATION, OR RECEIVE CONTINUING EDUCATION
CREDITS FOR PARTICIPATION;
(IV) ESTABLISH ON THE SCHOOL’S WEBSITE AN EASILY
ACCESSIBLE WEBPAGE THAT INCLUDES RESOURCES FOR A MENTAL HEALTH

HOUSE BILL 612 3
WELLNESS PROGRAM OR TRAINING ON FIRST AID; AND
(V) OFFER TO THE COMMUNITY AN EDUCATIONAL ASSEMBLY
ON MENTAL HEALTH WELLNESS AND RESOURCES.
(2) A LIFESAVER SCHOOL MAY UTILIZE A CERTIFIED THERAPY DOG
PROGRAM IN THE SCHOOL.
(E) A PUBLIC SCHOOL MAY PARTNER WITH THE COUNTY BOARD TO FULFILL
THE DEPARTMENT’S CRITERIA TO QUALIFY AS A LIFESAVER SCHOOL.
(F) ONCE EVERY 4 YEARS, A LIFESAVER SCHOOL IS REQUIRED TO REAPPLY
TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR APPROVAL TO MAINTAIN THE LIFESAVER SCHOOL
DESIGNATION.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.